ja: ディボットツールの爪の構造: 2本刃; フォーク型; 1本刃; 3本刃; その他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на вилицата на инструмента за поправка на чим: Два зъба; Вилицообразна; Един зъб; Три зъба; Друго
sv: Konfiguration av Divot-verktygets stift: Tvåstift; Gaffel; Enkelstift; Trestift; Övrigt
de: Zinkenkonfiguration des Divot-Tools: Zweizinkig; Gegabelt; Einzinkig; Dreizinkig; Sonstige
el: Διαμόρφωση ακίδων του εργαλείου επιδιόρθωσης χλοοτάπητα: Δύο ακίδων; Σε σχήμα πιρουνιού; Μίας ακίδας; Τριών ακίδων; Άλλο
ro-RO: Configurația vârfului sculei Divot: Doi dinți; Tip furcă; Un singur dinte; Trei dinți; Altele
pt-BR: Configuração dos dentes do reparador de gramado: Ponta dupla; Garfo; Ponta única; Ponta tripla; Outro
fr: Configuration des dents du relève-pitch: Deux dents; Fourche; Une dent; Trois dents; Autre
tr: Divot aleti uç konfigürasyonu: Çift tırnaklı; Çatallı; Tek tırnaklı; Üç tırnaklı; Diğer
it: Configurazione dei rebbi dell'attrezzo per scavare zolle: A due punte; A forchetta; A una punta; A tre punte; Altro
pt-PT: Configuração dos dentes da ferramenta de rebitagem: Dois dentes; Bifurcado; Um dente; Três dentes; Outro
hr-HR: Konfiguracija zubaca alata Divot: Dva zupca; U obliku vilice; Jedan zubac; Tri zupca; Ostalo
hu: Gyepvágó szerszám fogkiosztása: Kétágú; Villás; Egyágú; Háromágú; Egyéb
en: Divot tool prong configuration: Dual prong; Forked; Single prong; Triple prong; Other
cs: Konfigurace hrotů nástroje Divot: Dvojitý hrot; Vidlicové; Jednoduchý hrot; Trojitý hrot; Ostatní
sl-SI: Konfiguracija zobcev orodja Divot: Z dvema rogljema; Viličasto; Z enim rogljem; S tremi roglji; Drugo
vi: Cấu hình ngạnh dụng cụ sửa vết lõm: Hai chấu; Hình nĩa; Một chấu; Ba chấu; Khác
pl: Konfiguracja zębów narzędzia do naprawy divotów: Dwa zęby; Rozwidlone; Pojedynczy ząb; Potrójne; Inne
da: Konfiguration af divotværktøjets tænder: To spidser; Gaffelformet; Én spids; Tre spidser; Anden
nl: Divot gereedschap tandconfiguratie: Twee pinnen; Gevorkt; Eén pin; Drie pinnen; Overig
ru: Конфигурация зубцов инструмента для дивотов: Два зубца; Вилка; Один зубец; Три зубца; Другое
fi: Greenihaarukan piikkirakenne: Kaksipiikkinen; Haarukkamallinen; Yksipiikkinen; Kolmipiikkinen; Muu
ko: 디봇 툴 갈퀴 구성: 듀얼 프롱; 포크형; 싱글 프롱; 트리플 프롱; 기타
lt-LT: Divot įrankio dantukų konfigūracija: Dvejų šakučių; Šakutės formos; Vienos šakutės; Trejų šakučių; Kita
th: รูปแบบการจัดวางและจำนวนขาของอุปกรณ์ซ่อมรอยลูกกอล์ฟตก: สองขา; แบบส้อม; ขาเดียว; สามขา; อื่นๆ
es: Configuración de las puntas de la herramienta de reparación de divots: Punta doble; Bifurcado; Punta simple; Punta triple; Otro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia hrotov nástroja na opravu jamiek: S dvoma hrotmi; Vidlicová; S jedným hrotom; S tromi hrotmi; Iná
zh-CN: 草皮修复工具插脚配置: 双齿; 叉形; 单齿; 三齿; 其他
nb: Konfigurasjon av Divot-verktøyets spiss: To tenner; Gaffelformet; Én tann; Tre tenner; Annet
zh-TW: 球痕修復工具叉齒配置: 雙叉; 叉狀; 單叉; 三叉; 其他